Oklahoma, session 2025, SB189.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Section 1, Chapter 289, O.S.L.


2023 (70 O.S. Supp. 2024, Section 18-114.15), is amended to read as


follows:


Section 18-114.15. A. Beginning with the 2023-2024 school


year, certified personnel, as defined in Section 26-103 of Title 70


of the Oklahoma Statutes this title, in the public schools of


Oklahoma this state shall receive in salary and/or fringe benefits


not less than the amounts specified in the following schedule:


MINIMUM SALARY SCHEDULE

Req. No. 10 Page 1


National


Years of Bachelor’s Board Master’s Doctor’s


Experience Degree Certification Degree Degree


$39,601 $40,759 $40,991 $42,381


$40,035 $41,193 $41,425 $42,815


$40,469 $41,628 $41,859 $43,249


$40,904 $42,062 $42,294 $43,684


$41,338 $42,496 $42,728 $44,118


$42,810 $43,968 $44,200 $45,590


$43,273 $44,432 $44,663 $46,054


$43,737 $44,895 $45,127 $46,517


$44,200 $45,358 $45,590 $46,980


$44,663 $45,822 $46,054 $47,444


$46,684 $47,844 $48,568 $50,945


$47,177 $48,336 $49,061 $51,438


$47,670 $48,829 $49,554 $51,931


$48,162 $49,322 $50,047 $52,424


$48,655 $49,815 $50,539 $52,916


$50,167 $51,327 $52,052 $54,430


$50,660 $51,820 $52,545 $54,923


$51,153 $52,313 $53,038 $55,416


$51,646 $52,806 $53,531 $55,909


$52,139 $53,299 $54,024 $56,402


$52,652 $53,813 $54,538 $56,917

Req. No. 10 Page 2


$53,145 $54,306 $55,031 $57,410


$53,639 $54,799 $55,524 $57,903


$54,132 $55,292 $56,018 $58,397


$54,625 $55,785 $56,511 $58,890


$56,049 $57,232 $57,971 $60,395


Master’s Degree +


Years of National Board


Experience Certification


$42,149


$42,583


$43,018


$43,452


$43,886


$45,358


$45,822


$46,285


$46,749


$47,212


$49,728


$50,221


$50,713


$51,206


$51,699


$53,212

Req. No. 10 Page 3


$53,705


$54,198


$54,691


$55,184


$55,698


$56,192


$56,685


$57,178


$57,671


$59,153


B. 1. When determining the Minimum Salary Schedule minimum


salary schedule, “fringe benefits” shall mean all or part of


retirement benefits, excluding the contributions made pursuant to


subsection A of Section 17-108.1 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma


Statutes this title and the flexible benefit allowance pursuant to


Section 26-105 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title from


the flexible benefit allowance funds disbursed by the State Board of


Education and the State Board of Career and Technology Education


pursuant to Section 26-104 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes this


title.


2. If a school district intends to provide retirement benefits


to a teacher such that the teacher’s salary would be less than the


amounts set forth in the minimum salary schedule specified in


subsection A of this section, the district shall be required to

Req. No. 10 Page 4


provide written notification to the teacher prior to his or her


employment or, if already employed by the district, no later than


thirty (30) days prior to the date the district elects to provide


retirement benefits such that the teacher’s salary would be less


than the minimum salary schedule.


C. Any of the degrees referred to in this section shall be from


a college recognized by the State Board of Education. The Board


shall accept teaching experience from out-of-state school districts


that are accredited by the State Board of Education state board of


education or appropriate state accrediting agency for the districts.


The Board shall accept teaching experience from out-of-country


schools that are accredited or otherwise endorsed by the appropriate


national or regional accrediting or endorsement authority. Out-of-


country certification documentation in a language other than English


shall be analyzed by an educational credential evaluation service in


accordance with industry standards and guidelines and approved by


the State Department of Education. The person seeking to have


credit granted for out-of-country teaching experience shall be


responsible for all costs of the analysis by a credential evaluation


service. The Board shall accept teaching experience from primary


and secondary schools that are operated by the United States


Department of Defense or are affiliated with the United States


Department of State.



Req. No. 10 Page 5


D. For the purpose of state salary increments and retirement,


no teacher shall be granted credit for more than five (5) years of


active duty in the military service or out-of-state or out-of-


country teaching experience as a certified teacher or its


equivalent. Nothing in this section shall prohibit boards of


education from crediting more years of experience on district salary


schedules than those allowed for state purposes.


E. The State Board of Education shall recognize, for purposes


of certification and salary increments, all the years of experience


of a:


1. Certified teacher who teaches in the educational program of


the Department of Corrections, beginning with fiscal year 1981;


2. Vocational rehabilitation counselor under the Department of


Human Services if the counselor was employed as a certified teacher


by the State Department of Education when the Division of Vocational


Rehabilitation was transferred from the State Board of Career and


Technology Education or the State Board of Education to the Oklahoma


Public Welfare Commission on July 1, 1968;


3. Vocational rehabilitation counselor which were completed


while employed by the Department of Human Services if such counselor


was certified as a teacher or was eligible for certification as a


teacher in Oklahoma this state;





Req. No. 10 Page 6


4. Certified teacher which were completed while employed by the


Child Study Center located at University Hospital, if the teacher


was certified as a teacher in Oklahoma this state; and


5. Certified school psychologist or psychometrist which were


completed while employed as a doctoral intern, psychological


assistant, or psychologist with any agency of the State of Oklahoma


this state if the experience primarily involved work with persons of


school- or preschool-age and if the person was, at the time the


experience was acquired, certified as, or eligible for certification


as, a school psychologist or psychometrist.


F. The provisions of this section shall not apply to teachers


who have entered into postretirement employment with a public school


in Oklahoma this state and are still receiving a monthly retirement


benefit.


G. If a person employed as certified personnel, as defined in


Section 26-103 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title, by a


school district during the 2022-2023 school year was receiving a


salary above the step level indicated by the State Minimum Salary


Schedule state minimum salary schedule for the 2022-2023 school


year, the person shall receive a salary increase amount equal to the


amount indicated in subsection A of this section for the step level


indicated for the person, provided they remain he or she remains


employed by the same district, unless the hours or the duties of the


certified personnel are reduced proportionately.

Req. No. 10 Page 7


H. If a school district does not receive receives either


Foundation Aid or Salary Incentive Aid or receives neither


Foundation Aid nor Salary Incentive Aid pursuant to Section 18-200.1


of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title, funds appropriated


for the financial support of public schools shall be allocated by


the State Board of Education to implement the salary increases


indicated in subsection A of this section.


I. Persons employed as classroom instructional employees of


technology center school districts supervised by the State Board of


Career and Technology Education shall receive a salary increase


amount equal to the amount indicated in subsection A of this section


for the step level indicated for the person persons, provided they


remain employed by the same technology center school district,


unless the hours or the duties of the classroom instructional


employees are reduced proportionately.


J. Persons employed as correctional teachers or vocational


instructors by the Department of Corrections pursuant to Section


510.6a of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes or persons employed as


teachers by the Office of Juvenile Affairs shall receive a salary


increase amount equal to the amount indicated in subsection A of


this section for the step level indicated for the person persons,


provided they remain employed by the same Department of Corrections


or Office of Juvenile Affairs facility, unless the hours or the



Req. No. 10 Page 8


duties of the correctional teachers, vocational instructors, or


teachers are reduced proportionately.


K. Persons employed as teachers by the State Department of


Rehabilitation Services shall receive a salary increase amount equal


to the amount indicated in subsection A of this section for the step


level indicated for the person persons, provided they remain


employed by the State Department of Rehabilitation Services, unless


the hours or the duties of the teachers are reduced proportionately.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-10 EB 12/30/2024 1:59:29 PM



















Req. No. 10 Page 9